test/tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/fstspeller-gt-norm-yamls/CmpNP-tests_fstspeller-gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:  ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/generator-fstspeller-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/analyser-fstspeller-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:  ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/generator-fstspeller-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/analyser-fstspeller-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# Testing CmpNp/xxx tags. Currently only +CmpNP/Pref, +CmpNP/Last and +CmpNP/None are in use in sma

Tests:
  CmpNP/First tests:
    Stalin-monumente+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gïele+N+Sem/Lang_Tool+Sg+Nom: [Stalin-monumente∑#gïele, Stalin-monument∑#gïele]
    Stalin-monumente+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#gïele+N+Sem/Lang_Tool+Sg+Nom: [~Stalin-monumenten∑#gïele]
    gïele+N+Sem/Lang_Tool+Cmp-#Stalin-monumente+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: []

#det som kommer foran
  CmpNP/Pref tests:
#    geerve+A+Sg+Nom: ~geerve # Endra pos til A, har ingen avgrensingar når det gjeld samansetjing lenger.
    geerve+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#bïegke+N+Sem/Substnc_Wthr+Sg+Nom: geerve∑#bïegke
    bïegke+N+Sem/Substnc_Wthr+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geerve+A+Sg+Nom: ~bïegke∑#geerve
    bïegke+N+Sem/Substnc_Wthr+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geerve+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#bïegke+N+Sem/Substnc_Wthr+Sg+Nom: ~bïegke∑#geerve∑#bïegke

    aajege+N+Sem/Plc+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#bïegke+N+Sem/Substnc_Wthr+Sg+Nom: aajeh∑#bïegke
    bïegke+N+Sem/Substnc_Wthr+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#aajege+N+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: ~bïegke∑#aajege
    bïegke+N+Sem/Substnc_Wthr+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#aajege+N+Sem/Plc+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#bïegke+N+Sem/Substnc_Wthr+Sg+Nom: ~bïegke∑#aajeh∑#bïegke

  CmpNP/Last tests: 
#    njieljie+Num+Sg+Gen+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/k+A+Sg+Nom: njieljienjoelkege # joelkege only as lexicalised compound
    gïele+N+Sem/Lang_Tool+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#guaktah+N+Sem/Dummytag+Pl+Nom: [ gïele∑#guaktah]   # guaktah: Last, SgNomLeft
    gïele+N+Sem/Lang_Tool+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#guaktah+N+Sem/Dummytag+Pl+Nom: [~gïelen∑#guaktah] # guaktah: Last, SgNomLeft
    gïele+N+Sem/Lang_Tool+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#guaktah+N+Sem/Dummytag+Pl+Nom: [~gïeli∑#guaktah]  # guaktah: Last, SgNomLeft
    guaktah+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#gïele+N+Sem/Lang_Tool+Pl+Nom: [~guakta∑#gïelh,  ~guaktaj∑#gïelh]
    guaktah+N+Sem/Dummytag+Pl+Nom: guaktah
    
#det som kommer bak   
  CmpNP/Suff tests: 
    nuelie+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: ~nuelie
    nuelie+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gïele+N+Sem/Lang_Tool+Sg+Nom: [~nuelie∑#gïele]
    nuelie+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#gïele+N+Sem/Lang_Tool+Sg+Nom: [~nuelien∑#gïele]
    gïele+N+Sem/Lang_Tool+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#nuelie+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [gïele∑#nuelie]
    gïele+N+Sem/Lang_Tool+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#nuelie+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [gïelen∑#nuelie]
    gïele+N+Sem/Lang_Tool+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#nuelie+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [gïeli∑#nuelie]

  CmpNP/None tests:
    guaktegh+N+Sem/Dummytag+Pl+Nom: guaktegh
    guaktegh+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gïele+N+Sg+Nom: [~guaktegegïele]
    guaktegh+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#gïele+N+Sg+Nom: [~guaktegigïele]
    gïele+N+Sem/Lang_Tool+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#guaktegh+N+Sem/Dummytag+Pl+Nom: [~gïeleguaktegh]
    gïele+N+Sem/Lang_Tool+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#guaktegh+N+Sem/Dummytag+Pl+Nom: [~gïelenguaktegh]
    gïele+N+Sem/Lang_Tool+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#guaktegh+N+Sem/Dummytag+Pl+Nom: [~gïeliguaktegh]

# Outcommented because faerhmie is not tagged +CmpNP/Only, and there is no entry in the lexicon with the +CmpNP/Only tag.
# We do know from earlier tests that the machinery is working, though.
#  CmpNP/Only tests:
#    faerhmie+N+Sg+Nom: faerhmie
#    faerhmie+N+Cmp#gïele+N+Sg+Nom: [~faerhmiegïele, ~faerhmiengïele]
#    faerhmie+N+Cmp#moere+N+Sg+Nom: [moerefaerhmie, ~moerenfaerhmie, ~moerifaerhmie]
#    faerhmie+N+Cmp#moere+N+Cmp#moere+N+Sg+Nom: [gïeleåeliegïele, gïelenåeliegïele, gïeliåeliegïele, gïeleåeliengïele, gïelenåeliengïele, gïeliåeliengïele]
